Alabama, session 2026rs, HB462.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
38 Section 1. Section 34-24-140, as last amended by Act
39 2025-335, 2025 Regular Session, and Section 34-24-160, Code of
40 Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
41 "§34-24-140
42 (a) There is established a State Board of Chiropractic
43 Examiners. The board shall be composed of nine members. Eight
44 members of the board shall be active licensed chiropractors
45 elected as provided in this section. Seven of the elected
46 members shall be elected one from each congressional district
47 in this state except as otherwise provided in Section
48 34-24-141. Any candidate for or member of the board shall be a
49 resident of the appropriate congressional district except one
50 candidate for the board shall be elected from the state
51 at-large. One elected member of the board shall be elected
52 from the state at-large and shall be an African-American.
53 (b) Each elected member of or candidate for the board
54 shall meet all of the following qualifications:
55 (1) Be Is a resident of this state who has resided in
56 this state for at least five years.
Page 2

this state for at least five years.
HB462 INTRODUCED
57 (2) Be Is a graduate of a chartered chiropractic school
58 or college that required actual attendance in the school as a
59 prerequisite to graduation.
60 (3) Currently is Is currently engaged in the clinical
61 practice of chiropractic and has been engaged in the clinical
62 practice in this state for at least the five immediately
63 preceding years.
64 (4) Has renewed his or her license to practice
65 chiropractic by September 30 of the year in which an election
66 shall take place.
67 (5) Be Is of good moral character.
68 (6) Is not presently on probation relating to the
69 practice of chiropractic in any state.
70 (c) One member of the board shall be a consumer member
71 appointed by the Governor. Neither the consumer member nor his
72 or her spouse may be a chiropractor. The consumer member may
73 not be an immediate family member of a chiropractor nor may he
74 or she be employed in the chiropractic field.
75 (d)(1) The elected members of the board shall be
76 elected as provided in this subsection. In August of any year
77 that the term of a member of the board expires, the board
78 shall send a notice of the election of the board and the
79 method of qualifying as a candidate to each active licensed
80 chiropractor in the district where the vacancy occurs
81 according to his or her permanent mailing address.
82 (2) The election provided for in this subsection shall
83 be conducted by an independent agency unless there is only one
84 candidate for the board and in this situation, in which case
Page 3

candidate for the board and in this situation, in which case
HB462 INTRODUCED
85 the board shall announce the results. The board shall set a
86 period for candidates to qualify and the date for the ballots
87 to be sent. Candidates shall qualify by submitting their name
88 to the executive director of the board during the qualifying
89 period which shall be not less than 20 days nor more than 40
90 days after the notice is sent.
91 (3) Not less than 14 days after the deadline for
92 qualification, each licensed chiropractor shall be sent a
93 ballot for the appropriate congressional district where the
94 vacancy is to be filled. In order to be counted, the ballots
95 shall must be returned and time stamped not later than 14
96 business days after the ballots were sent by the independent
97 agency.
98 (4) The results of the election shall be certified by
99 the independent agency. The ballots shall be maintained for a
100 period of six months by the independent agency. The candidate
101 with a simple majority of the votes cast in each respective
102 congressional district shall be elected to the board position
103 for that congressional district. In the event If no candidate
104 in a district receives a majority of the votes, the board
105 shall hold a run-off election in the same manner as provided
106 in this subsection.
107 (5) The members of the board shall take office at the
108 first meeting of the board after the election and the
109 executive director of the board shall set the date of the
110 first meeting of the board after the election of the new
111 board.
112 (e) Whenever a vacancy occurs on the board, whether by
Page 4

(e) Whenever a vacancy occurs on the board, whether by
HB462 INTRODUCED
113 death, resignation of a member, or other cause, the vacancy
114 shall be filled in the same manner as the original election or
115 appointment for the remainder of the term of office.
116 (f)(1) The board may employ investigators, inspectors,
117 attorneys, and any other agents, employees, and assistants as
118 may be necessary, and may use any other means necessary to
119 bring about and maintain a rigid administration and
120 enforcement of administer and enforce state and federal law.
121 (2) The board may issue subpoenas and compel the
122 attendance of witnesses and the production of all necessary
123 papers, books, records, documentary evidence and materials, or
124 other evidence. Any individual failing or refusing to appear
125 or testify regarding any matter about which he or she may be
126 lawfully questioned or to produce any papers, books, records,
127 documentary evidence or materials, or other evidence in the
128 matter to be heard, after having been required by order of the
129 board or by a or subpoena of the board to do so, upon
130 application by the board to any circuit judge of this state,
131 may be ordered to comply therewith. Upon failure to comply
132 with the order of the circuit judge, the court may compel
133 obedience by attachment as for contempt as in case of
134 disobedience of a similar order or subpoena issued by the
135 court. The president or secretary-treasurer of the board may
136 issue subpoenas, and any board member may administer oaths to
137 witnesses or take their affirmation. A subpoena or other
138 process of paper may be served upon any person named therein,
139 anywhere within this state, by any officer authorized to serve
140 subpoenas or other process or paper in civil actions, in the
Page 5

subpoenas or other process or paper in civil actions, in the
HB462 INTRODUCED
141 same manner as is prescribed by law for subpoenas issued out
142 of the circuit courts of this state, the fees and mileage and
143 other costs to be paid as the board directs.
144 (g) The board shall employ an executive director who
145 shall be responsible for the administration of board policy.
146 The executive director may be licensed to practice
147 chiropractic in this state.
148 (h) The board shall publish annually a directory
149 listing all permit holders and all persons licensed to
150 practice chiropractic in this state. Copies of the directory
151 shall be made available from the executive director at a cost
152 set by rule of the board.
153 (i) The membership of the board shall be inclusive and
154 reflect the racial, gender, geographic, urban, rural, and
155 economic diversity of the state.
156 (j) Each member of the board shall meet all
157 qualifications to be a candidate for his or her seat on the
158 board during his or her entire term. Any member who fails to
159 continue to meet the qualifications for his or her seat shall
160 forfeit his or her seat on the board and resign or the board
161 seat shall be declared vacant by the board."
162 "§34-24-160
163 (a) Any person individual wishing the right to practice
164 chiropractic shall make application to the State Board of
165 Chiropractic Examiners in the form as the board may prescribe.
166 (b)(1) In addition to other requirements established by
167 law and for the purpose of determining an applicant's
168 suitability for a license to practice chiropractic, each
Page 6

suitability for a license to practice chiropractic, each
HB462 INTRODUCED
169 applicant shall submit a complete set of fingerprints to the
170 State Board of Chiropractic Examiners board.
171 (2) The board shall submit the fingerprints provided by
172 each applicant for a license to practice chiropractic to the
173 Alabama Bureau of Investigation (ABI) Alabama State Law
174 Enforcement Agency. The fingerprints shall be forwarded by the
175 ABI board or agency to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
176 (FBI) for a state and national criminal history record
177 background check. Costs associated with conducting a criminal
178 history background check shall be borne by the applicant.
179 (3) The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners board
180 shall keep information received pursuant to this section
181 confidential, except that such any information received and
182 relied upon in denying the issuance of a license to practice
183 chiropractic in this state may be disclosed as may be
184 necessary to support the denial. This requirement also shall
185 apply to any person who is not licensed as a chiropractor who
186 applies for a permit pursuant to Section 34-24-123(b).
187 (c) Each applicant shall be of good moral character,
188 and a citizen of the United States or, if not a citizen of the
189 United States, a person an individual who is legally present
190 in the United States with appropriate documentation from the
191 federal government.
192 (d) Each applicant shall be a graduate of a chartered
193 chiropractic school or college accredited by the council of
194 chiropractic education which teaches only attendance courses
195 and requires a minimum four-year standard college course
196 Council of Chiropractic Education or a successor entity.
Page 7

Council of Chiropractic Education or a successor entity.
HB462 INTRODUCED
197 (e) An applicant for licensure who graduated from
198 chiropractic college after January 1, 2010, shall have a
199 bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university.
200 Absent a bachelor's degree, the requirement may be met by an
201 academic graduate degree from a regionally accredited college
202 or university and proof that the applicant has taken a
203 nationally recognized standardized test commensurate with that
204 applicant's graduate degree.
205 (f) The An application shall be signed by the applicant
206 in his or her own handwriting, and shall be notarized, and
207 shall recite the history of the applicant's educational
208 qualifications, how long he or she has studied chiropractic,
209 what collateral branches, if any, he or she has studied, and
210 the length of time he or she has engaged in clinical practice,
211 with proof thereof in the form of diplomas, certificates, and
212 transcripts, etc.
213 (g) Each applicant shall submit with his or her
214 application satisfactory evidence of good character and
215 reputation.
216 (h)(1) Each applicant for licensure shall pay to the
217 board a license application fee of not less than fifty dollars
218 ($50) and not more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150), the
219 exact amount to be fixed annually by resolution of the State
220 Board of Chiropractic Examiners as set by rule of the board.
221 The fee shall accompany the application.
222 (2) A fee of not less than fifty dollars ($50) and not
223 more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150), the exact amount
224 to be fixed by resolution of the State Board of Chiropractic
Page 8

to be fixed by resolution of the State Board of Chiropractic
HB462 INTRODUCED
225 Examiners as set by rule of the board, shall be paid for any
226 subsequent examination."
227 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
228 1, 2026.
Page 9